incubator/apertium-ku-fa.ku.dix
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ABCÇDEÊFGHIÎJKLMNOPQRSŞTUÛVWXYZabcçdeêfghiîjklmnopqrsştuûvwxyz</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"       c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="np"      c="Proper noun"/>
    <sdef n="pr"      c="Preposition"/>
    <sdef n="num"     c="Numeral"/>
    <sdef n="prn"     c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="adj"     c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="adv"     c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="enc"     c="Enclitic"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"  c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"  c="Sub-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="vbcop"   c="Copula"/>

    <sdef n="m"       c="Masculine"/>
    <sdef n="f"       c="Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="mf"      c="Masculine, feminine"/>

    <sdef n="p1"      c="First person"/>
    <sdef n="p2"      c="Second person"/>
    <sdef n="p3"      c="Third person"/>

    <sdef n="sg"      c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="pl"      c="Plural"/>
    <sdef n="sp"      c="Singular, plural"/>

    <sdef n="def"     c="Definite"/>
    <sdef n="ind"     c="Indefinite"/>
    <sdef n="dem"     c="Demonstrative"/>
    <sdef n="ref"     c="Reflexive"/>
    <sdef n="rel"     c="Relative"/>
    <sdef n="emp"     c="Emphatic"/>

    <sdef n="pst"     c="Positive"/>
    <sdef n="comp"    c="Comparative"/>
    <sdef n="sup"     c="Superlative"/>

    <sdef n="nom"     c="Nominative"/>
    <sdef n="obl"     c="Oblique"/>
    <sdef n="con"     c="Construct"/>
    <sdef n="voc"     c="Vocative"/>

    <sdef n="top"     c="Toponym"/>

    <sdef n="pres"    c="Present"/>
    <sdef n="fut"     c="Future"/>
    <sdef n="neg"     c="Negative"/>

    <sdef n="sent"    c="End-of-sentence marker"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="separa">
      <e>
        <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="sent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="yek__num">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ê</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ek</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ekê</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eke</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="şeş__num">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ê</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ek</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ekê</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eke</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="S__ê_dê__enc">
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l/>
          <r/>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>ê</l>
          <r><j/>tense<s n="enc"/><s n="fut"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e r="LR"> 
        <p> 
          <l><b/>dê</l>
          <r><j/>tense<s n="enc"/><s n="fut"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="personal_pronouns__prn">
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>ez</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p> 
	<par n="S__ê_dê__enc"/>
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>min</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 


      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>tu</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p> 
	<par n="S__ê_dê__enc"/>
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>te</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 

      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>ew</l>
          <r>ew<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p> 
	<par n="S__ê_dê__enc"/>
      </e> 

      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>em</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p> 
	<par n="S__ê_dê__enc"/>
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>me</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 

      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>hûn</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p> 
	<par n="S__ê_dê__enc"/>
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>we</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/ew__prn">
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>ew</l>
          <r>ew<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>wî</l>
          <r>ew<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>wê</l>
          <r>ew<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>wan</l>
          <r>ew<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/ev__prn">
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>ev</l>
          <r>ev<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>vî</l>
          <r>ev<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>vê</l>
          <r>ev<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>van</l>
          <r>ev<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="xwe__prn">
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ku__prn">
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
    </pardef>

    <!-- Verbs -->
    <pardef n="ne__neg">
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l/>
          <r><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
    </pardef>

    <e lm="personal pronouns"><i/><par n="personal_pronouns__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ew"><i/><par n="/ew__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ev"><i/><par n="/ev__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="xwe"><i>xwe</i><par n="xwe__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ku"><i>ku</i><par n="ku__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ko"><p><l>ko</l><r>ku</r></p><par n="ku__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="yek"><i>yek</i><par n="yek__num"/></e>
    <e lm="di"><i>du</i><par n="şeş__num"/></e>
    <e lm="sê"><i>sê</i><par n="şeş__num"/></e>
    <e lm="çar"><i>çar</i><par n="şeş__num"/></e>
    <e lm="pênc"><i>pênc</i><par n="şeş__num"/></e>
    <e lm="şeş"><i>şeş</i><par n="şeş__num"/></e>
    <e lm="heft"><i>heft</i><par n="şeş__num"/></e>
    <e lm="heşt"><i>heşt</i><par n="şeş__num"/></e>
    <e lm="neh"><i>neh</i><par n="şeş__num"/></e>
    <e lm="deh"><i>deh</i><par n="şeş__num"/></e>
    <e lm="yanzdeh"><i>yanzdeh</i><par n="şeş__num"/></e>
    <e lm="dwanzdeh"><i>dwanzdeh</i><par n="şeş__num"/></e>
    <e lm="sêzdeh"><i>sêzdeh</i><par n="şeş__num"/></e>
    <e lm="çardeh"><i>çardeh</i><par n="şeş__num"/></e>
    <e lm="panzdeh"><i>panzdeh</i><par n="şeş__num"/></e>
    <e lm="şanzdeh"><i>şanzdeh</i><par n="şeş__num"/></e>
    <e lm="hivdeh"><i>hivdeh</i><par n="şeş__num"/></e>
    <e lm="hijdeh"><i>hijdeh</i><par n="şeş__num"/></e>
    <e lm="nozdeh"><i>nozdeh</i><par n="şeş__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ne"><i>ne</i><par n="ne__neg"/></e>
    <e>
      <par n="numeros"/> <!-- Numbers -->
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="separa"/> <!-- Sentence marks -->
    </e>
